Montana, session 2025, HB35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 3-1-1101, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-1-1101. Creation and composition of commission -- allocation. (1) There is created a judicial
standards commission consisting of five members as follows:
(a) two district court judges appointed by the speaker of the house as provided in 3-1-1115 and
confirmed by the senate;
(b) one attorney who has practiced law in this state for at least 10 years, appointed by the attorney
general and confirmed by the senate; and
(c) two citizens who are not attorneys or judges of any court, active or retired, appointed by the
governor and confirmed by the senate.
(2) Members shall serve staggered 4-year terms.
(3) The judicial standards commission is allocated to the department of justice for administrative
purposes only as prescribed in 2-15-121. However, the commission may hire its own personnel, and 2-15-
121(2)(d) does not apply.
(4) The judicial standards commission shall exercise its functions independently of the department
and without approval or control of the department."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 35